Florida, session 2026, SB186.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 20 385.207, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 21 385.207âCare and assistance of persons with epilepsy; 22 establishment of programs in epilepsy control.â 23 (2)âThe Department of Health shall: 24 (e)âInstitute and maintain an educational program among 25 physicians, hospitals, county health departments, and the public 26 concerning epilepsy, including the dissemination of information 27 and the conducting of educational programs concerning the 28 prevention of epilepsy and methods developed and used for the 29 care and treatment of persons with epilepsy. The educational 30 program must include the education and training requirements of 31 s. 1006.0626(3) and (5). 32 Section 2.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1), paragraph (b) 33 of subsection (2), and paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of 34 section 1006.0626, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection 35 (5) is added to that section, to read: 36 1006.0626âCare of students with epilepsy or seizure 37 disorders.â 38 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 39 (c)ââSchoolâ has the same meaning as in s. 1003.01(17) and 40 includes charter schools under s. 1002.33. 41 (2) 42 (b)âAn ISAP must be developed and signed by a medical 43 professional, in consultation with the studentâs parent, and 44 include the following: 45 1.âWritten orders from the studentâs medical professional, 46 in a form determined by the medical professional, outlining the 47 studentâs epilepsy or seizure disorder recommended care. 48 2.âThe parentâs signature. 49 3.âThe studentâs epilepsy or seizure disorder symptoms. 50 4.âAny accommodations the student requires for school 51 trips, after-school programs and activities, class parties, and 52 any other school-related activities. 53 5.âWhen and whom to call for medical assistance. 54 6.âThe studentâs ability to manage, and the studentâs level 55 of understanding of, his or her epilepsy or seizure disorder. 56 7.âHow to maintain communication with the student; the 57 studentâs parent; and the studentâs health care team, school 58 nurse, and educational staff. 59 8.âAny rescue medication prescribed by the studentâs 60 medical professional and how and when to administer the 61 medication. 62 (3)âThe school nurse or an appropriate school employee of a 63 school that receives an ISAP pursuant to subsection (2) shall: 64 (b)âVerify that each school district or charter school 65 employee whose duties include regular contact with the student, 66 including any employee who teaches or transports the student to 67 and from school or school activities, has completed training in 68 the care of students with epilepsy and seizure disorders. The 69 training must include how to recognize the symptoms of and 70 provide care for epilepsy and seizure disorders. To assist 71 schools in meeting this requirement, the Department of Education 72 shall identify on its website one or more online training 73 courses that are provided by a nonprofit national organization 74 that supports the welfare of individuals with epilepsy and 75 seizure disorders and are available free of charge to schools. 76 The completion of training is valid for 5 years. 77 (5)âEach school as defined in paragraph (1)(c) shall 78 display a poster developed by the department which describes the 79 basic steps of responding to an individual having a seizure. The 80 department shall identify one or more posters that are provided 81 by a national nonprofit organization that supports the welfare 82 of individuals with epilepsy and seizure disorders and are 83 available free of charge to schools. 84 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.